Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Chapter 11. Savings and Loan Associations
[Repealed]

§§ 81-11-1 through 81-11-89.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 66, eff from and after July 1, 1977.

§81-11-1. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 1]

§81-11-3. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-02; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 2; 1968, ch. 272, § 1]

§81-11-5. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-03; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 3; 1968, ch. 272, § 2; 1976, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 4, § 3]

§81-11-7. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-04; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 4(a)]

§81-11-9. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-05; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 4(b)]

§81-11-11. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 5]

§81-11-13. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-07; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 6(a)]

§81-11-15. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-08; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 6(b)]

§81-11-17. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-09; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 6(c)]

§81-11-19. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-10; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 6(d)]

§81-11-21. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-11; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 6(e); 1971, ch. 405, § 1]

§81-11-23. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-12; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 6(f-k)]

§81-11-25. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-13; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 7]

§81-11-27. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-13.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 490]

§81-11-29. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-14; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 8]

§81-11-31. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-15; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 9; 1968, ch. 272, § 3; 1974, ch. 416]

§81-11-33. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-16; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 10; 1971, ch. 337, § 1]

§81-11-35. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-17; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 11; 1971, ch. 404, § 1]

§81-11-37. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-18; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 12]

§81-11-39. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-19; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 13]

§81-11-41. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-20; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 14]

§81-11-43. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-21; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 15]

§81-11-45. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-22; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 16]

§81-11-47. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-23; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 17; 1973, ch. 363, § 1]

§81-11-49. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-24; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 18]

§81-11-51. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-25; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 19; 1968, ch. 272, § 4; 1972, ch. 404, § 1]

§81-11-53. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-26; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 20; 1972, ch. 404, § 2]

§81-11-55. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-27; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 21]

§81-11-57. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-28; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 22(a)]

§81-11-59. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-29; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 22(b)]

§81-11-61. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-30; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 22(c)]

§81-11-63. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-31; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 22(d)]

§81-11-65. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-32; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 22(e)]

§81-11-67. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-33; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 22(f)]

§81-11-69. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-34; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 22(g)]

§81-11-71. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-35; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 22(h); Laws, 1971, ch. 415, § 1]

§81-11-73. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-36; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 22(i)]

§81-11-75. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-37; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 22(j)]

§81-11-77. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-38; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 23]

§81-11-79. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-39; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 24]

§81-11-81. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-40; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 25; Laws, 1976, 1st Ex. Sess., ch. 4, § 1]

§81-11-83. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-41; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 26]

§81-11-85. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-12; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 27]

§81-11-87. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-13; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 28]

§81-11-89. [Codes, 1942, § 5288-14; Laws, 1962, ch. 228, § 29]

§§ 81-11-91 through 81-11-95.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 542, § 12-14, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1997).

§81-11-91. [Laws, 1976, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 4, § 2; Laws 1977, ch. 301]

§81-11-93. [Laws, 1976, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 4, § 5]

§81-11-95. [Laws, 1976, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 4, § 4]